Massachusetts, session 194th, S929.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “opportunities”, in line 14, the
following words:-
It is hereby further declared to be the policy of the commonwealth to guarantee free
public higher education as a right for all residents.
SECTION 2. Chapter 15A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 45 the following section:-
Section 46. (a) Definitions
of 3

As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:
“Board”, the Board of Higher Education.
“Eligible Student”, any person admitted to Massachusetts public college or university or
other public certificate, vocational, or adult education program, enrolled full-time or part-time,
other than a nonimmigrant alien within the meaning of paragraph 15 of subsection (a)(A)
through (S) of 8 U.S.C., section 1101 of the federal act, who has attended a high school in the
commonwealth for 3 or more years and has graduated from a high school in the commonwealth
or attained the equivalent thereof from an adult basic education program in the commonwealth,
or is currently a student in a Massachusetts public higher education institution qualifying for in-
state tuition under federal regulations, shall be eligible at any state institution of higher education
in the commonwealth. The Legislature finds that this is a state law within the meaning of 8
U.S.C. 1621(d).
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, the
board shall create a grant program to pay the equivalent of tuition and mandatory fees to an
eligible student at any Massachusetts public college or university, or certificate, vocational or
training program at a public institution. Students meeting the income eligibility for Federal Pell
Grants shall receive additional aid in grants to pay for the additional costs of attendance as
calculated by the academic institution of enrollment, including, but not limited to, room and
board, books and supplies, transportation and personal expenses.
(c) The grant shall supplement and shall not replace state grants, gift aid, institutional aid,
or federal aid through the Free Application for Federal Student Aid process. The board shall
of 3

promulgate regulations to ensure funds from this program do not affect eligibility for other state
grants, gift aid, institutional aid, or federal aid through the Free Application for Federal Student
Aid process.
(d) All public higher education and public vocational training institutions shall be
considered eligible institutions for this program and there shall be no restrictions on a student’s
choice of academic programs.
(e) The board shall provide an annual notice of eligibility for this program to all eligible
students and all new graduates from a Massachusetts high school or GED program. The board
shall maintain a database of all students currently or potentially eligible for this program.
of 3